District of Columbia statutes.
38-1308

Supplemental funding.

The Mayor and the Council shall be authorized to obtain supplemental funding for the Commission. The Council shall approve the receipt of any such supplemental funding.

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 8, 23 DCR 8734
1981 Ed., § 31-1608.
1973 Ed., § 31-2008.